results/hyph_ca_ES.dic
UTF-8
% ======================================================================
% Catalan Hunspell Hyphenation Dictionary. Release 1.5 (May 2023)
% Copyright (C) 2012-2023 Jaume Ortolà i Font - www.riuraueditors.cat
% ======================================================================
%
% This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
% it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
% the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
% (at your option) any later version.
%
% This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
% but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
% MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
% GNU General Public License for more details.
%
% You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
% along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
%
% ======================================================================
%
% This configuration has been tested for Adobe InDesign Hunspell Plugin
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 1
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
NOHYPHEN ',’
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
l·9l/=,2,1
ŀ9l/l=,1,1
8’8
8'8
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1da
1de
1di
1do
3du
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1ja
1je
1ji
1jo
1ju
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1na
1ne
3ni
1no
1nu
1pa
3pe
3pi
3po
1pu
1qu
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1xa
1xe
1xi
1xo
1xu
1za
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1bé
1bí
1bó
1bú
1bà
1bè
1bò
1cé
1cí
1có
1cú
1cà
1cè
1cò
1ço
1ça
1çu
1çó
1çú
1çà
1çò
1dé
1dí
1dó
1dú
1dà
1dè
1dò
1fé
1fí
1fó
1fú
1fà
1fè
1fò
1gé
1gí
1gó
1gú
1gà
1gè
1gò
1gü
1hé
1hí
1hó
1hú
1hà
1hè
1hò
1jé
1jí
1jó
1jú
1jà
1jè
1jò
1ké
1kí
1kó
1kú
1kà
1kè
1kò
1lé
1lí
1ló
1lú
1là
1lè
1lò
1mé
1mí
1mó
1mú
1mà
1mè
1mò
1né
1ní
1nó
1nú
1nà
1nè
1nò
1pé
1pí
1pó
1pú
1pà
1pè
1pò
1qü
1ré
1rí
1ró
1rú
1rà
1rè
1rò
1sé
1sí
1só
1sú
1sà
1sè
1sò
1té
1tí
1tó
1tú
1tà
1tè
1tò
1vé
1ví
1vó
1vú
1và
1vè
1vò
1xé
1xí
1xó
1xú
1xà
1xè
1xò
1zé
1zí
1zó
1zú
1zà
1zè
1zò
1wa
1we
1wi
1wo
1wu
3l2la
1l2le
1l2li
3l2lo
1l2lu
1b2la
1b2le
1b2li
1b2lo
1b2lu
1b2ra
1b2re
1b2ri
1b2ro
1b2ru
1c2la
1c2le
1c2li
1c2lo
1c2lu
1c2ra
1c2re
1c2ri
1c2ro
1c2ru
1d2ra
1d2re
1d2ri
1d2ro
1d2ru
1f2la
1f2le
1f2li
1f2lo
1f2lu
1f2ra
1f2re
1f2ri
1f2ro
1f2ru
1g2la
1g2le
1g2li
1g2lo
1g2lu
1g2ra
1g2re
1g2ri
1g2ro
1g2ru
1p2la
1p2le
1p2li
1p2lo
1p2lu
1p2ra
1p2re
1p2ri
1p2ro
1p2ru
1t2ra
1t2re
1t2ri
1t2ro
1t2ru
1n2ya
1n2ye
1n2yi
1n2yo
1n2yu
1l2lé
1l2lí
1l2ló
1l2lú
1l2là
1l2lè
1l2lò
1b2lé
1b2lí
1b2ló
1b2lú
1b2là
1b2lè
1b2lò
1b2ré
1b2rí
1b2ró
1b2rú
1b2rà
1b2rè
1b2rò
1c2lé
1c2lí
1c2ló
1c2lú
1c2là
1c2lè
1c2lò
1c2ré
1c2rí
1c2ró
1c2rú
1c2rà
1c2rè
1c2rò
1d2ré
1d2rí
1d2ró
1d2rú
1d2rà
1d2rè
1d2rò
1f2lé
1f2lí
1f2ló
1f2lú
1f2là
1f2lè
1f2lò
1f2ré
1f2rí
1f2ró
1f2rú
1f2rà
1f2rè
1f2rò
1g2lé
1g2lí
1g2ló
1g2lú
1g2là
1g2lè
1g2lò
1g2ré
1g2rí
1g2ró
1g2rú
1g2rà
1g2rè
1g2rò
1p2lé
1p2lí
1p2ló
1p2lú
1p2là
1p2lè
1p2lò
1p2ré
1p2rí
1p2ró
1p2rú
1p2rà
1p2rè
1p2rò
1t2ré
1t2rí
1t2ró
1t2rú
1t2rà
1t2rè
1t2rò
1n2yé
1n2yí
1n2yó
1n2yú
1n2yà
1n2yè
1n2yò
1n2yá
a1a
a1e
a1o
e1a
e1e
e1o
i1a
i1e
i1o
o1a
o1e
o1o
u1a
u1e
u1o
a1é
a1í
a1ó
a1ú
a1à
a1è
a1ò
a1ï
a1ü
e1é
e1í
e1ó
e1ú
e1à
e1è
e1ò
e1ï
e1ü
i1é
i1í
i1ó
i1ú
i1à
i1è
i1ò
i1ï
i1ü
o1é
o1í
o1ó
o1ú
o1à
o1è
o1á
o1ò
o1ï
o1ü
u1é
u1í
u1ó
u1ú
u1à
u1è
u1ò
u1ï
u1ü
é1a
é1e
é1o
é1ï
é1ü
í1a
í1e
í1o
í1i
í1ï
í1ü
ó1a
ó1e
ó1o
ó1ï
ó1ü
ú1a
ú1e
ú1o
ú1ï
ú1ü
à1a
à1e
à1o
à1ï
à1ü
è1a
è1e
è1o
è1ï
è1ü
ò1a
ò1e
ò1o
ò1ï
ò1ü
ï1a
ï1e
ï1o
ï1é
ï1í
ï1ó
ï1ú
ï1à
ï1è
ï1ò
ï1i
ü1a
ü1e
ü1o
ü1é
ü1í
ü1ó
ü1ú
ü1à
ü1è
ü1ò
a1i2a
a1i2e
a1i2o
a1i2u
a1u2a
a1u2e
a1u2i
a1u2o
a1u2u
e1i2a
e1i2e
e1i2o
e1i2u
e1u2a
e1u2e
e1u2i
e1u2o
e1u2u
i1i2a
i1i2e
i1i2o
i1i2u
i1u2a
i1u2e
i1u2i
i1u2o
i1u2u
o1i2a
o1i2e
o1i2o
o1i2u
o1u2a
o1u2e
o1u2o
o1u2i
o1u2u
u1i2a
u1i2e
u1i2o
u1i2u
u1u2a
u1u2e
u1u2i
u1u2o
u1u2u
a1i2é
a1i2í
a1i2ó
a1i2ú
a1i2à
a1i2è
a1i2ò
a1u2é
a1u2í
a1u2ó
a1u2ú
a1u2à
a1u2è
a1u2ò
e1i2é
e1i2í
e1i2ó
e1i2ú
e1i2à
e1i2è
e1i2ò
e1u2é
e1u2í
e1u2ó
e1u2ú
e1u2à
e1u2è
e1u2ò
i1i2é
i1i2í
i1i2ó
i1i2ú
i1i2à
i1i2è
i1i2ò
i1u2é
i1u2í
i1u2ó
i1u2ú
i1u2à
i1u2è
i1u2ò
o1i2é
o1i2í
o1i2ó
o1i2ú
o1i2à
o1i2è
o1i2ò
o1u2é
o1u2í
o1u2ó
o1u2ú
o1u2à
o1u2è
o1u2ò
u1i2é
u1i2í
u1i2ó
u1i2ú
u1i2à
u1i2è
u1i2ò
u1u2é
u1u2í
u1u2ó
u1u2ú
u1u2à
u1u2è
u1u2ò
é1i2a
é1i2e
é1i2o
é1i2u
é1u2a
é1u2e
é1u2o
é1u2i
é1u2u
í1i2a
í1i2e
í1i2o
í1i2u
í1u2a
í1u2e
í1u2o
í1u2i
í1u2u
ó1i2a
ó1i2e
ó1i2o
ó1i2u
ó1u2a
ó1u2e
ó1u2o
ó1u2i
ó1u2u
ú1i2a
ú1i2e
ú1i2o
ú1i2u
ú1u2a
ú1u2e
ú1u2o
ú1u2i
ú1u2u
à1i2a
à1i2e
à1i2o
à1i2u
à1u2a
à1u2e
à1u2o
à1u2i
à1u2u
è1i2a
è1i2e
è1i2o
è1i2u
è1u2a
è1u2e
è1u2o
è1u2i
è1u2u
ò1i2a
ò1i2e
ò1i2o
ò1i2u
ò1u2a
ò1u2e
ò1u2o
ò1u2i
ò1u2u
ï1i2a
ï1i2e
ï1i2o
ï1i2é
ï1i2í
ï1i2ó
ï1i2ú
ï1i2à
ï1i2è
ï1i2ò
ï1i2u
ï1u2a
ï1u2e
ï1u2o
ï1u2é
ï1u2í
ï1u2ó
ï1u2ú
ï1u2à
ï1u2è
ï1u2ò
ï1u2i
ï1u2u
ü1i2a
ü1i2e
ü1i2o
ü1i2é
ü1i2í
ü1i2ó
ü1i2ú
ü1i2à
ü1i2è
ü1i2ò
ü1i2u
ü1u2a
ü1u2e
ü1u2o
ü1u2é
ü1u2í
ü1u2ó
ü1u2ú
ü1u2à
ü1u2è
ü1u2ò
ü1u2i
ü1u2u
qu2i
qu1i3a
qu1i3à
qu1i3e
qu1i3è
qu1i3é
qu1i3o
qu1i3ó
qu1i3ò
qu1i3ú
gu2i
gu1i3a
gu1i3à
gu1i3e
gu1i3è
gu1i3é
gu1i3o
gu1i3ó
gu1i3ò
.i2a
.i2e
.i2o
.i2u
.u2a
.u2e
.u2i
.u2o
.h4
.hi2a
.1hi
.hi2e
.hi2o
.hi2u
.hu2a
.1hu
.hu2e
.hu2i
.hu2o
.i2é
.i2í
.i2ó
.i2ú
.i2à
.i2è
.i2ò
.u2é
.u2í
.u2ó
.u2ú
.u2à
.u2è
.u2ò
.hi2é
.hi2ó
.hi2ú
.hi2à
.hi2è
.hi2ò
.hu2é
.hu2í
.hu2ó
.hu2à
.hu2è
.hu2ò
-i2o
gu2a
gu2e
gu2o
gu2à
gu2é
gu2è
gu2í
gu2ó
gu2ò
qu2a
qu2e
qu2o
qu2à
qu2è
qu2é
qu2í
qu2ó
qu2ò
gü2e
gü2é
gü2í
gü2è
gü2i
qü2e
qü2é
qü2í
qü2è
qü2i
a1isme.
ais1me
e1isme.
eis1me
i1isme.
iis1me
o1isme.
ois1me
u1isme.
uis1me
a1ista.
ais1ta
e1ista.
eis1ta
i1ista.
iis1ta
o1ista.
ois1ta
u1ista.
uis1ta
a1iste.
ais1te
e1iste.
eis1te
i1iste.
iis1te
o1iste.
ois1te
u1iste.
uis1te
a1ismes.
e1ismes.
i1ismes.
o1ismes.
u1ismes.
a1istes.
e1istes.
i1istes.
o1istes.
u1istes.
a1istament.
aista1me
e1istament.
eista1me
i1istament.
iista1me
o1istament.
oista1me
u1istament.
uista1me
a1um.
e1um.
i1um.
o1um.
u1um.
a1ums.
e1ums.
i1ums.
o1ums.
u1ums.
.b4
.c4
.d4
.f4
.g4
.j4
.k4
.l4
.m4
.n4
.q4
.r4
.s4
.t4
.v4
.w4
.x4
.z4
.p4s4
.p4t4
.p4n4
.m4n4
.t4s4
.g4n4
.c4n4
.f4t4
.k4h4
.k4r4
.k4l4
.s4c4
.s4t4
.r4h4
.t4x4
.s4h4
.s4n4
.g4h4
.s4p4
.c4t4
.sch4
.s4w
.t4w
.s4t4o
3f4t4alat
f1ta
fta1la
3f4t4à1li
f1tà
na4f5t4à1li
naf1tà
3p4n4eumà1ti
p1ne
pneu1mà
3f4taleïn
fta1le
ftale1ï
à1id.
è1id.
é1id.
ò1id.
ó1id.
ú1id.
à1ids.
è1ids.
ó1ids.
ò1ids.
ú1ids.
u1ir.
qu4ir.
gu4ir.
u1int.
qu4int.
gu4int.
e1ir.
e1int.
a1ir.
a1int.
o1ir.
o1int.
u1ir-
qu4ir-
gu4ir-
u1int-
qu4int-
gu4int-
e1ir-
e1int-
a1ir-
a1int-
o1ir-
o1int-
.cu4ir.
.1cu
.va4ir.
.1va
a1iré.
ai1ré
a1iràs.
ai1rà
a1irà.
a1irem.
ai1re
a1ireu.
a1iran.
ai1ra
e1iré.
ei1ré
e1iràs.
ei1rà
e1irà.
e1irem.
ei1re
e1ireu.
e1iran.
ei1ra
o1iré.
oi1ré
o1iràs.
oi1rà
o1irà.
o1irem.
oi1re
o1ireu.
o1iran.
oi1ra
u1iré.
ui1ré
u1iràs.
ui1rà
u1irà.
u1irem.
ui1re
u1ireu.
u1iran.
ui1ra
qu4iré.
qui1ré
qu4iràs.
qui1rà
qu4irà.
qu4irem.
qui1re
qu4ireu.
qu4iran.
qui1ra
gu4iré.
gui1ré
gu4iràs.
gui1rà
gu4irà.
gu4irem.
gui1re
gu4ireu.
gu4iran.
gui1ra
.ca4ir
.1ca
.de2s
.de1s3a
.desa4ir
.1de
.enla4ir
.en1la
.esca4ir
.es1ca
.fla4ir
.1f2la
.repa4ir
.1re
.re1pa
a1iria.
ai1ri
airi1a
a1iries.
airi1e
a1iríem.
ai1rí
airí1e
a1iríeu.
a1irien.
e1iria.
ei1ri
eiri1a
e1iries.
eiri1e
e1iríem.
ei1rí
eirí1e
e1iríeu.
e1irien.
o1iria.
oi1ri
oiri1a
o1iries.
oiri1e
o1iríem.
oi1rí
oirí1e
o1iríeu.
o1irien.
u1iria.
ui1ri
uiri1a
u1iries.
uiri1e
u1iríem.
ui1rí
uirí1e
u1iríeu.
u1irien.
qu4iria.
qui1ri
quiri1a
qu4iries.
quiri1e
qu4iríem.
qui1rí
quirí1e
qu4iríeu.
qu4irien.
gu4iria.
gui1ri
guiri1a
gu4iries.
guiri1e
gu4iríem.
gui1rí
guirí1e
gu4iríeu.
gu4irien.
.para4iria.
.1pa
.pa1ra
.parai1ri
.parairi1a
.para4iries.
.parairi1e
.pera4iria.
.3pe
.pe1ra
.perai1ri
.perairi1a
.pera4iries.
.perairi1e
.le4iria.
.1le
.lei1ri
.leiri1a
.c2h2
.t2h2
.w2h2
.b4d
.b4h
.w4r4
.z4w4
hi4àt
hi1à
3p4si1co
p1si
3p4si1qu
3p4sí1qu
p1sí
co3incid
coin1ci
i3onitz
io3ni
l3f4t
o3p4neum
op1ne
tio3u1re
ti1o
tio3u1ri
.a2b3alien
.a1ba
.aba1li
.abali1e
.a2b3ampe1re
.abam3pe
.a2b3axial
.aba1xi
.abaxi1a
.a2b3intes1ta
.a1bi
.abin1te
.a2d3axial
.a1da
.ada1xi
.adaxi1a
.a2b3reacc
.a1b2re
.abre1a
a4b3rog
a1b2ro
.a4n3abi1o
.a1na
.ana1bi
.a4n3abi1ò
.a4n3acústic
.ana1cú
.anacús1ti
.a4n3ae1ro
.ana1e
.a4n3ae1rò
.a4n3afrod
.ana1f2ro
.a4n3alcoh
.anal1co
.a4n3alfabet
.anal1fa
.analfa1be
.a4n3algè1si
.anal1gè
.a4n3algesi1na
.anal1ge
.analge1si
.a4n3àlgi1a
.a1nà
.anàl1gi
.a4n3al·
.a4n3amnio1ta
.anam3ni
.anamni1o
.a4n3anabàsi1a
.a1na1na
.anana1bà
.ananabà1si
.a4n3anastàsi1a
.ananas1tà
.ananastà1si
.a4n3apodíctic
.ana3po
.anapo1dí
.anapodíc1ti
.a4n3àrtri1a
.anàr1t2ri
.a4n3àspid
.anàs3pi
.a4n3astigm
.anas1ti
.a4n3ecoic
.a1ne
.ane1co
.a4n3elast
.ane1la
.a4n3elèctric
.ane1lè
.anelèc1t2ri
.a4n3energètic
.ane1ne
.anener1gè
.anenergè1ti
.a4n3epígraf
.ane1pí
.anepí1g2ra
.a4n3epigràfic
.ane3pi
.anepi1g2rà
.anepigrà1fi
.a4n3erotis1me
.ane1ro
.anero1ti
.a4n3este1si
.anes1te
.a4n3estè1si
.anes1tè
.a4n3eu1p2lo
.a4n3ictèric
.a3ni
.anic1tè
.anictè1ri
.a4n3ideaci1ó
.ani1de
.anide1a
.anidea1ci
.a4n3i1ó
.a4n3iònic
.ani1ò
.aniò3ni
.a4n3iotropi1a
.ani1o
.anio1t2ro
.aniotro3pi
.a4n3irídi1a
.ani1rí
.anirí1di
.a4n3i1so
.a4n3i1sò
.a4n3odònci1a
.a1no
.ano1dò
.anodòn1ci
.a4n3opistògraf
.ano3pi
.anopis1tò
.anopistò1g2ra
.a4n3orc
.a4n3o1rè
.a4n3or1gà
.a4n3òrtic
.a1nò
.anòr1ti
.a4n3ort
.a4n3ostracis
.anos1t2ra
.anostra1ci
.a4n3ovul
.ano1vu
.a4n3oxèmi1a
.ano1xè
.anoxè1mi
.a4n3ò1xi
.a4n3o1xi
.a4n3ur
.a1nu
.a4n3úri1a
.a1nú
.anú1ri
.a2n3axial
.ana1xi
.anaxi1a
.a2n3abiò1ti
.a2n3adè3ni
.ana1dè
.a2n3nabà1si
.an1na
.anna1bà
.a2n3artròpo1de
.anar1t2rò
.anartrò3po
.a2n3aspida1ci
.anas3pi
.anaspi1da
.a2n3esta1b2le
.anes1ta
.a2n3euso1mi
.aneu1so
.a2n3oftàl1mi
.anof1tà
.a2n3è1d2ri
.a1nè
.anti3i
.an1ti
.anti3u
.auto3i
.au1to
argü5i
ar1gü
argü5í
argü5ï
argü5e
.arque1us.
.ar1qu
.arqu2e
.adamaua3ubangu2i
.ada1ma
.adama1u2a
.adamauau1ba
.adamauauban1gu
.a4l1l3io1li
.a1l2li
.alli1o
.a4ll3ipe1b2re
.alli3pe
o3immun
oim1mu
.al4t3alemany
.al1ta
.alta1le
.altale1ma
.al4t3imperial
.al1ti
.altim3pe
.altimpe1ri
.altimperi1a
.a4n3an1d2re
.anglo3i
.an1g2lo
.a4n3io1no
.aniso3ic
.a4n3òs1mi
.a3p4neumàtic
.a3p4n4eumà1ti
.ap1ne
.apneu1mà
.a3p4nèumi1a
.ap1nè
.apnèu1mi
.a3p4tialis1me
.ap1ti
.apti1a
.aptia1li
.atropo3isomeri1a
.a1t2ro
.atro3po
.atropoi1so
.atropoiso1me
.atropoisome1ri
.auto4ic
be4s3a1vi
be1sa
be4s3à1vi
be1sà
be4s3on1c2le
be1so
.bio3i
.1bi
.bi1o
.bi3un
.be4n3afect
.1be
.be1na
.bena1fe
.be4n3am
.be4n3an
.be4n3as1t2ru
.be4n3au1ra
.be4n3aven
.bena1ve
.be4n3avin
.bena1vi
.be4n3entès
.be1ne
.benen1tè
.be4n3es1ta
.be4n3inten
.be3ni
.benin1te
.bai4x3alemany
.1ba
.bai1xa
.baixa1le
.baixale1ma
.bai4x3imperial
.bai1xi
.baixim3pe
.baiximpe1ri
.baiximperi1a
.ba3t4ho3ni
.ba1t2ho
.bi4s3anual
.bi1sa
.bisa1nu
.bisanu1a
.bi1uret
.biu1re
.brew3s4ter
.1b2re
.brews1te
.bronco3p4neu
.1b2ro
.bron1co
.broncop1ne
í3um.
í3ums.
.ca4p3alç
.ca1pa
.ca4p3alc
.ca4p3alt
.ca4p3ialt
.ca3pi
.capi1a
.ca4p3esflo1ra
.ca3pe
.capes1f2lo
.ca4p3ial1ça
.ca4p3ipot
.capi3po
.cen4t3enram
.1ce
.cen1te
.centen1ra
.cibe4r3espai
.1ci
.ci1be
.cibe1re
.ciberes1pa
.ci4s3al1pí
.ci1sa
.ci4s3alpin
.cisal3pi
.ca4p3iampl
.ca4p3icaus
.capi1ca
.ca4p3i1cu
.ca4p3i1mo
.carbodi3imid
.car1bo
.carbo1di
.carbodii1mi
.ce4l3obert
.ce1lo
.celo1be
.cen4t3engran
.centen1g2ra
.ce4s3alp
.ce1sa
cla4r3obscur
cla1ro
clarobs1cu
àusi3us.
àu1si
.cofi4s3imofis
.1co
.co1fi
.cofi1si
.cofisi1mo
.cofisimo1fi
.co4l3iflor
.co1li
.coli1f2lo
.co4l3inap
.coli1na
.co4ll3estret
.co1l2le
.colles1t2re
.co4ll3i1bè
.co1l2li
.co4n3establ
.co1ne
.cones1ta
.co4n3on1c2le
.co1no
.contra3i
.con1t2ra
.co4n3ur1ba
.co1nu
.co4r3agr
.co1ra
.co4r3esforç
.co1re
.cores1fo
.co4r3esforc
.curaça4o
.cu1ra
.cura1ça
.curi4e
.cu1ri
de1b2ye
.de3s4ament
.desa1me
.de3s4ar.
.de3s4ant.
.de3s4at.
.de3s4ada.
.desa1da
.de3s4ats.
.de3s4ades.
.desa1de
.de1s3o
.de3s4o.
.de3s4e.
.de1se
.des3es
.de3s4es.
.de3s4a.
.des3em
.de3s4em.
.de3s4eu.
.des3en
.de3s4en.
.de3s4ava.
.desa1va
.de3s4aves.
.desa1ve
.de3s4àvem.
.de1sà
.desà1ve
.de3s4àveu.
.de3s4aven.
.de3s4í.
.de1sí
.de3s4ares.
.desa1re
.de3s4à.
.de3s4àrem.
